Louisiana, session 2026, HB60.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:103(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:103(A)(9)
and (B)(3) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§103. Disturbing the peace
A. Disturbing the peace is the doing of any of the following in such manner
as would foreseeably disturb or alarm the public:
* * *
(9)(a) Intentionally and without lawful authority entering or remaining in a
church or other place of worship during a religious gathering or worship service with
the intent to create a disturbance, interrupt, or interfere with the worship service and
causing a substantial disturbance of the service by any of the following:
(i) Violent, tumultuous, or threatening behavior directed at any person
lawfully attending, leading, or participating in the service.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-540 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 60
(ii) Unreasonably loud or abusive language or noise such that the service is
materially disrupted, including causing the cessation of the service, a significant
delay, or the dispersal of participants.
(iii) Interference with the conduct of the service by physical obstruction,
intimidation, or threat of force toward clergy, worship leaders, or attendees.
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, a disturbance or interruption is
"substantial" when it causes a material disruption of the ability of participants to
engage in or continue the religious gathering or worship service, including the
cessation of the service, a significant delay, or the dispersal of participants.
(c) Nothing in this Paragraph shall be construed to prohibit activity protected
by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Louisiana, including
peaceful expressive activity conducted in a lawful manner that does not substantially
disturb, interrupt, or interfere with a religious gathering or worship service.
B.
* * *
(3)(a) Whoever commits or conspires with another to commit the crime of
disturbing the peace as provided in Paragraph (A)(9) of this Section shall be
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than five years, fined not more
than five thousand dollars, or both.
(b) Whoever uses a dangerous weapon or inflicts serious bodily injury while
committing the crime of disturbing the peace as provided in Paragraph (A)(9) of this
Section shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than ten years,
fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or both.
(c) Whoever acts in concert with another person while committing the crime
of disturbing the peace as provided in Paragraph (A)(9) of this Section shall be
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than seven years, fined not more
than seven thousand five hundred dollars, or both.
C. For the purposes of Paragraphs (A)(7) and (8) of this Section, the
following terms shall have the following meanings:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-540 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 60
(1) "Acts in concert" means the formulation of a common plan, agreement,
or mutual understanding, whether the plan is formed in advance or during the
commission of the offense.
(2) "Church or other place of worship" means any building, structure, or
place, whether permanently or temporarily used, that is primarily used for religious
worship, including the grounds and appurtenant premises.
(1) (3) "Funeral" includes a funeral, funeral home viewing, wake, or
memorial service.
(2) (4) "Funeral route" means the route of ingress or egress from the location
of a funeral or burial, including thirty feet from the outer edge of the outside lane of
the route.
(5) "Religious gathering or worship service" means any assembly, meeting,
rite, ceremony, or service held for the purpose of religious worship, prayer,
preaching, teaching, or devotion.